Illinois, session 104th, HB5541.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 5changing Sections 3.150, 3.155, 3.330, 21, and 22.34 and by 6adding Sections 3.123, 3.126, 3.182, 3.198, 3.308, and 3.309 7as follows: 8    (415 ILCS 5/3.123 new)9    Sec. 3.123. Anaerobic digestion. "Anaerobic digestion" 10means the process by which microorganisms break down organic 11material in the absence of oxygen to produce biogas and 12digestate.  13    (415 ILCS 5/3.126 new)14    Sec. 3.126. Biogas. "Biogas" means the gas produced by the 15anaerobic decomposition of organic material.  16    (415 ILCS 5/3.150)  (was 415 ILCS 5/3.69)17    Sec. 3.150. Compost. "Compost" means is defined as the 18humus-like product of the process of composting waste, which 19may be used as a soil conditioner.20(Source: P.A. 92-574, eff. 6-26-02.)   HB5541 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1    (415 ILCS 5/3.155)  (was 415 ILCS 5/3.70)2    Sec. 3.155. Composting. "Composting" means the biological 3treatment process by which microorganisms aerobically 4decompose organic material under controlled conditions to 5produce compost. the organic fraction of waste, producing 6compost.7(Source: P.A. 92-574, eff. 6-26-02.) 8    (415 ILCS 5/3.182 new)9    Sec. 3.182. Digestate. "Digestate" means the solid and 10liquid end products of anaerobic digestion. 11    (415 ILCS 5/3.198 new)12    Sec. 3.198. Food waste. "Food waste" means the organic 13waste fraction of garbage. 14    (415 ILCS 5/3.308 new)15    Sec. 3.308. Organic material. "Organic material" means 16carbon-based material originating from living organisms. 17    (415 ILCS 5/3.309 new)18    Sec. 3.309. Organic waste. "Organic waste" means organic 19material that meets the definition of "waste" under this Act. 20    (415 ILCS 5/3.330)  (was 415 ILCS 5/3.32)21    Sec. 3.330. Pollution control facility.   HB5541 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1    (a) "Pollution control facility" is any waste storage 2site, sanitary landfill, waste disposal site, waste transfer 3station, waste treatment facility, or waste incinerator. This 4includes sewers, sewage treatment plants, and any other 5facilities owned or operated by sanitary districts organized 6under the Metropolitan Water Reclamation District Act.7    The following are not pollution control facilities:8        (1) (blank);9        (2) waste storage sites regulated under 40 CFR 761.42;10        (3) sites or facilities used by any person conducting 11    a waste storage, waste treatment, waste disposal, waste 12    transfer or waste incineration operation, or a combination 13    thereof, for wastes generated by such person's own 14    activities, when such wastes are stored, treated, disposed 15    of, transferred or incinerated within the site or facility 16    owned, controlled or operated by such person, or when such 17    wastes are transported within or between sites or 18    facilities owned, controlled or operated by such person;19        (4) sites or facilities at which the State is 20    performing removal or remedial action pursuant to Section 21    22.2 or 55.3;22        (5) abandoned quarries used solely for the disposal of 23    concrete, earth materials, gravel, or aggregate debris 24    resulting from road construction activities conducted by a 25    unit of government or construction activities due to the 26    construction and installation of underground pipes, lines,   HB5541 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1    conduit or wires off of the premises of a public utility 2    company which are conducted by a public utility;3        (6) sites or facilities used by any person to 4    specifically conduct a landscape composting operation;5        (7) regional facilities as defined in the Central 6    Midwest Interstate Low-Level Radioactive Waste Compact;7        (8) the portion of a site or facility where coal 8    combustion wastes are stored or disposed of in accordance 9    with subdivision (r)(2) or (r)(3) of Section 21;10        (9) the portion of a site or facility used for the 11    collection, storage or processing of waste tires as 12    defined in Title XIV;13        (10) the portion of a site or facility used for 14    treatment of petroleum contaminated materials by 15    application onto or incorporation into the soil surface 16    and any portion of that site or facility used for storage 17    of petroleum contaminated materials before treatment. Only 18    those categories of petroleum listed in Section 57.9(a)(3) 19    are exempt under this subdivision (10);20        (11) the portion of a site or facility where used oil 21    is collected or stored prior to shipment to a recycling or 22    energy recovery facility, provided that the used oil is 23    generated by households or commercial establishments, and 24    the site or facility is a recycling center or a business 25    where oil or gasoline is sold at retail;26        (11.5) processing sites or facilities that receive   HB5541 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1    only on-specification used oil, as defined in 35 Ill. Adm. 2    Code 739, originating from used oil collectors for 3    processing that is managed under 35 Ill. Adm. Code 739 to 4    produce products for sale to off-site petroleum 5    facilities, if these processing sites or facilities are: 6    (i) located within a home rule unit of local government 7    with a population of at least 30,000 according to the 2000 8    federal census, that home rule unit of local government 9    has been designated as an Urban Round II Empowerment Zone 10    by the United States Department of Housing and Urban 11    Development, and that home rule unit of local government 12    has enacted an ordinance approving the location of the 13    site or facility and provided funding for the site or 14    facility; and (ii) in compliance with all applicable 15    zoning requirements; 16        (12) the portion of a site or facility utilizing coal 17    combustion waste for stabilization and treatment of only 18    waste generated on that site or facility when used in 19    connection with response actions pursuant to the federal 20    Comprehensive Environmental Response, Compensation, and 21    Liability Act of 1980, the federal Resource Conservation 22    and Recovery Act of 1976, or the Illinois Environmental 23    Protection Act or as authorized by the Agency;24        (13) the portion of a site or facility regulated under 25    Section 22.38 of this Act;26        (14) the portion of a site or facility, located within   HB5541 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1    a unit of local government that has enacted local zoning 2    requirements, used to accept, separate, and process 3    uncontaminated broken concrete, with or without protruding 4    metal bars, provided that the uncontaminated broken 5    concrete and metal bars are not speculatively accumulated, 6    are at the site or facility no longer than one year after 7    their acceptance, and are returned to the economic 8    mainstream in the form of raw materials or products;9        (15) the portion of a site or facility located in a 10    county with a population over 3,000,000 that has obtained 11    local siting approval under Section 39.2 of this Act for a 12    municipal waste incinerator on or before July 1, 2005 and 13    that is used for a non-hazardous waste transfer station; 14        (16) a site or facility that temporarily holds in 15    transit for 10 days or less, non-putrescible solid waste 16    in original containers, no larger in capacity than 500 17    gallons, provided that such waste is further transferred 18    to a recycling, disposal, treatment, or storage facility 19    on a non-contiguous site and provided such site or 20    facility complies with the applicable 10-day transfer 21    requirements of the federal Resource Conservation and 22    Recovery Act of 1976 and United States Department of 23    Transportation hazardous material requirements. For 24    purposes of this Section only, "non-putrescible solid 25    waste" means waste other than municipal garbage that does 26    not rot or become putrid, including, but not limited to,   HB5541 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1    paints, solvent, filters, and absorbents; 2        (17) the portion of a site or facility located in a 3    county with a population greater than 3,000,000 that has 4    obtained local siting approval, under Section 39.2 of this 5    Act, for a municipal waste incinerator on or before July 6    1, 2005 and that is used for wood combustion facilities 7    for energy recovery that accept and burn only wood 8    material, as included in a fuel specification approved by 9    the Agency; 10        (18) a transfer station used exclusively for landscape 11    waste, including a transfer station where landscape waste 12    is ground to reduce its volume, where the landscape waste 13    is held no longer than 24 hours from the time it was 14    received;15        (19) the portion of a site or facility that (i) is used 16    for the composting of organic waste of food scrap, 17    livestock waste, crop residue, uncontaminated wood waste, 18    or paper waste, including, but not limited to, corrugated 19    paper or cardboard, and (ii) meets all of the following 20    requirements:21            (A) There must not be more than a total of 30,000 22        cubic yards of livestock waste in raw form or in the 23        process of being composted at the site or facility at 24        any one time.25            (B) All organic waste food scrap, livestock waste, 26        crop residue, uncontaminated wood waste, and paper   HB5541 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1        waste must, by the end of each operating day, be 2        processed and placed into an enclosed vessel in which 3        air flow and temperature are controlled, or all of the 4        following additional requirements must be met:5                (i) The portion of the site or facility used 6            for the composting operation must include a 7            setback of at least 200 feet from the nearest 8            potable water supply well.9                (ii) The portion of the site or facility used 10            for the composting operation must be located 11            outside the boundary of the 10-year floodplain or 12            floodproofed.13                (iii) Except in municipalities with more than 14            1,000,000 inhabitants, the portion of the site or 15            facility used for the composting operation must be 16            located at least one-eighth of a mile from the 17            nearest residence, other than a residence located 18            on the same property as the site or facility.19                (iv) The portion of the site or facility used 20            for the composting operation must be located at 21            least one-eighth of a mile from the property line 22            of all of the following areas:23                    (I) Facilities that primarily serve to 24                house or treat people that are 25                immunocompromised or immunosuppressed, such as 26                cancer or AIDS patients; people with asthma,   HB5541 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1                cystic fibrosis, or bioaerosol allergies; or 2                children under the age of one year.3                    (II) Primary and secondary schools and 4                adjacent areas that the schools use for 5                recreation.6                    (III) Any facility for child care licensed 7                under Section 3 of the Child Care Act of 1969; 8                preschools; and adjacent areas that the 9                facilities or preschools use for recreation.10                (v) By the end of each operating day, all 11            organic waste food scrap, livestock waste, crop 12            residue, uncontaminated wood waste, and paper 13            waste must be (i) processed into windrows or other 14            piles and (ii) covered in a manner that prevents 15            scavenging by birds and animals and that prevents 16            other nuisances.17            (C) Organic waste Food scrap, livestock waste, 18        crop residue, uncontaminated wood waste, paper waste, 19        and compost must not be placed within 5 feet of the 20        water table.21            (D) The site or facility must meet all of the 22        requirements of the Wild and Scenic Rivers Act (16 23        U.S.C. 1271 et seq.).24            (E) The site or facility must not (i) restrict the 25        flow of a 100-year flood, (ii) result in washout of 26        organic waste food scrap, livestock waste, crop   HB5541 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1        residue, uncontaminated wood waste, or paper waste 2        from a 100-year flood, or (iii) reduce the temporary 3        water storage capacity of the 100-year floodplain, 4        unless measures are undertaken to provide alternative 5        storage capacity, such as by providing lagoons, 6        holding tanks, or drainage around structures at the 7        facility.8            (F) The site or facility must not be located in any 9        area where it may pose a threat of harm or destruction 10        to the features for which:11                (i) an irreplaceable historic or 12            archaeological site has been listed under the 13            National Historic Preservation Act (16 U.S.C. 470 14            et seq.) or the Illinois Historic Preservation 15            Act;16                (ii) a natural landmark has been designated by 17            the National Park Service or the Illinois State 18            Historic Preservation Office; or19                (iii) a natural area has been designated as a 20            Dedicated Illinois Nature Preserve under the 21            Illinois Natural Areas Preservation Act.22            (G) The site or facility must not be located in an 23        area where it may jeopardize the continued existence 24        of any designated endangered species, result in the 25        destruction or adverse modification of the critical 26        habitat for such species, or cause or contribute to   HB5541 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1        the taking of any endangered or threatened species of 2        plant, fish, or wildlife listed under the Endangered 3        Species Act (16 U.S.C. 1531 et seq.) or the Illinois 4        Endangered Species Protection Act; 5        (20) the portion of a site or facility that is located 6    entirely within a home rule unit having a population of no 7    less than 120,000 and no more than 135,000, according to 8    the 2000 federal census, and that meets all of the 9    following requirements:10            (i) the portion of the site or facility is used 11        exclusively to perform testing of a thermochemical 12        conversion technology using only woody biomass, 13        collected as landscape waste within the boundaries of 14        the home rule unit, as the hydrocarbon feedstock for 15        the production of synthetic gas in accordance with 16        Section 39.9 of this Act;17            (ii) the portion of the site or facility is in 18        compliance with all applicable zoning requirements; 19        and20            (iii) a complete application for a demonstration 21        permit at the portion of the site or facility has been 22        submitted to the Agency in accordance with Section 23        39.9 of this Act within one year after July 27, 2010 24        (the effective date of Public Act 96-1314);25        (21) the portion of a site or facility used to perform 26    limited testing of a gasification conversion technology in   HB5541 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1    accordance with Section 39.8 of this Act and for which a 2    complete permit application has been submitted to the 3    Agency prior to one year from April 9, 2010 (the effective 4    date of Public Act 96-887); 5        (22) the portion of a site or facility that is used to 6    incinerate only pharmaceuticals from residential sources 7    that are collected and transported by law enforcement 8    agencies under Section 17.9A of this Act; 9        (23) the portion of a site or facility: 10            (A) that is used exclusively for the transfer of 11        commingled landscape waste and food waste food scrap 12        held at the site or facility for no longer than 24 13        hours after their receipt;14            (B) that is located entirely within a home rule 15        unit having a population of (i) not less than 100,000 16        and not more than 115,000 according to the 2010 17        federal census, (ii) not less than 5,000 and not more 18        than 10,000 according to the 2010 federal census, or 19        (iii) not less than 25,000 and not more than 30,000 20        according to the 2010 federal census or that is 21        located in the unincorporated area of a county having 22        a population of not less than 700,000 and not more than 23        705,000 according to the 2010 federal census;24            (C) that is permitted, by the Agency, prior to 25        January 1, 2002, for the transfer of landscape waste 26        if located in a home rule unit or that is permitted   HB5541 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1        prior to January 1, 2008 if located in an 2        unincorporated area of a county; and3            (D) for which a permit application is submitted to 4        the Agency to modify an existing permit for the 5        transfer of landscape waste to also include, on a 6        demonstration basis not to exceed 24 months each time 7        a permit is issued, the transfer of commingled 8        landscape waste and food waste food scrap or for which 9        a permit application is submitted to the Agency within 10        6 months of August 11, 2017 (the effective date of 11        Public Act 100-94);12        (24) the portion of a municipal solid waste landfill 13    unit:14            (A) that is located in a county having a 15        population of not less than 55,000 and not more than 16        60,000 according to the 2010 federal census;17            (B) that is owned by that county;18            (C) that is permitted, by the Agency, prior to 19        July 10, 2015 (the effective date of Public Act 20        99-12); and21            (D) for which a permit application is submitted to 22        the Agency within 6 months after July 10, 2015 (the 23        effective date of Public Act 99-12) for the disposal 24        of non-hazardous special waste;25        (25) the portion of a site or facility used during a 26    mass animal mortality event, as defined in the Animal   HB5541 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1    Mortality Act, where such waste is collected, stored, 2    processed, disposed, or incinerated under a mass animal 3    mortality event plan issued by the Department of 4    Agriculture; and 5        (26) the portion of a mine used for the placement of 6    limestone residual materials generated from the treatment 7    of drinking water by a municipal utility in accordance 8    with rules adopted under Section 22.63. 9    (b) A new pollution control facility is:10        (1) a pollution control facility initially permitted 11    for development or construction after July 1, 1981; or12        (2) the area of expansion beyond the boundary of a 13    currently permitted pollution control facility; or14        (3) a permitted pollution control facility requesting 15    approval to store, dispose of, transfer or incinerate, for 16    the first time, any special or hazardous waste.17(Source: P.A. 102-216, eff. 1-1-22; 102-310, eff. 8-6-21; 18102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-333, eff. 1-1-24.) 19    (415 ILCS 5/21)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 1021)20    Sec. 21. Prohibited acts. No person shall:21    (a) Cause or allow the open dumping of any waste.22    (b) Abandon, dump, or deposit any waste upon the public 23highways or other public property, except in a sanitary 24landfill approved by the Agency pursuant to regulations 25adopted by the Board.  HB5541 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1    (c) Abandon any vehicle in violation of the "Abandoned 2Vehicles Amendment to the Illinois Vehicle Code", as enacted 3by the 76th General Assembly.4    (d) Conduct any waste-storage, waste-treatment, or 5waste-disposal operation:6        (1) without a permit granted by the Agency or in 7    violation of any conditions imposed by such permit, 8    including periodic reports and full access to adequate 9    records and the inspection of facilities, as may be 10    necessary to assure compliance with this Act and with 11    regulations and standards adopted thereunder; provided, 12    however, that, except for municipal solid waste landfill 13    units that receive waste on or after October 9, 1993, and 14    CCR surface impoundments, no permit shall be required for 15    (i) any person conducting a waste-storage, 16    waste-treatment, or waste-disposal operation for wastes 17    generated by such person's own activities which are 18    stored, treated, or disposed within the site where such 19    wastes are generated, (ii) until one year after the 20    effective date of rules adopted by the Board under 21    subsection (n) of Section 22.38, a facility located in a 22    county with a population over 700,000 as of January 1, 23    2000, operated and located in accordance with Section 24    22.38 of this Act, and used exclusively for the transfer, 25    storage, or treatment of general construction or 26    demolition debris, provided that the facility was   HB5541 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1    receiving construction or demolition debris on August 24, 2    2009 (the effective date of Public Act 96-611), or (iii) 3    any person conducting a waste transfer, storage, 4    treatment, or disposal operation, including, but not 5    limited to, a waste transfer or waste composting 6    operation, under a mass animal mortality event plan 7    created by the Department of Agriculture;8        (2) in violation of any regulations or standards 9    adopted by the Board under this Act;10        (3) which receives waste after August 31, 1988, does 11    not have a permit issued by the Agency, and is (i) a 12    landfill used exclusively for the disposal of waste 13    generated at the site, (ii) a surface impoundment 14    receiving special waste not listed in an NPDES permit, 15    (iii) a waste pile in which the total volume of waste is 16    greater than 100 cubic yards or the waste is stored for 17    over one year, or (iv) a land treatment facility receiving 18    special waste generated at the site; without giving notice 19    of the operation to the Agency by January 1, 1989, or 30 20    days after the date on which the operation commences, 21    whichever is later, and every 3 years thereafter. The form 22    for such notification shall be specified by the Agency, 23    and shall be limited to information regarding: the name 24    and address of the location of the operation; the type of 25    operation; the types and amounts of waste stored, treated 26    or disposed of on an annual basis; the remaining capacity   HB5541 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1    of the operation; and the remaining expected life of the 2    operation.3    Item (3) of this subsection (d) shall not apply to any 4person engaged in agricultural activity who is disposing of a 5substance that constitutes solid waste, if the substance was 6acquired for use by that person on his own property, and the 7substance is disposed of on his own property in accordance 8with regulations or standards adopted by the Board.9    This subsection (d) shall not apply to hazardous waste.10    (e) Dispose, treat, store or abandon any waste, or 11transport any waste into this State for disposal, treatment, 12storage or abandonment, except at a site or facility which 13meets the requirements of this Act and of regulations and 14standards thereunder.15    (f) Conduct any hazardous waste-storage, hazardous 16waste-treatment or hazardous waste-disposal operation:17        (1) without a RCRA permit for the site issued by the 18    Agency under subsection (d) of Section 39 of this Act, or 19    in violation of any condition imposed by such permit, 20    including periodic reports and full access to adequate 21    records and the inspection of facilities, as may be 22    necessary to assure compliance with this Act and with 23    regulations and standards adopted thereunder; or24        (2) in violation of any regulations or standards 25    adopted by the Board under this Act; or26        (3) in violation of any RCRA permit filing requirement   HB5541 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1    established under standards adopted by the Board under 2    this Act; or3        (4) in violation of any order adopted by the Board 4    under this Act.5    Notwithstanding the above, no RCRA permit shall be 6required under this subsection or subsection (d) of Section 39 7of this Act for any person engaged in agricultural activity 8who is disposing of a substance which has been identified as a 9hazardous waste, and which has been designated by Board 10regulations as being subject to this exception, if the 11substance was acquired for use by that person on his own 12property and the substance is disposed of on his own property 13in accordance with regulations or standards adopted by the 14Board.15    (g) Conduct any hazardous waste-transportation operation:16        (1) without registering with and obtaining a special 17    waste hauling permit from the Agency in accordance with 18    the regulations adopted by the Board under this Act; or19        (2) in violation of any regulations or standards 20    adopted by the Board under this Act.21    (h) Conduct any hazardous waste-recycling or hazardous 22waste-reclamation or hazardous waste-reuse operation in 23violation of any regulations, standards or permit requirements 24adopted by the Board under this Act.25    (i) Conduct any process or engage in any act which 26produces hazardous waste in violation of any regulations or   HB5541 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1standards adopted by the Board under subsections (a) and (c) 2of Section 22.4 of this Act.3    (j) Conduct any special waste-transportation operation in 4violation of any regulations, standards or permit requirements 5adopted by the Board under this Act. However, sludge from a 6water or sewage treatment plant owned and operated by a unit of 7local government which (1) is subject to a sludge management 8plan approved by the Agency or a permit granted by the Agency, 9and (2) has been tested and determined not to be a hazardous 10waste as required by applicable State and federal laws and 11regulations, may be transported in this State without a 12special waste hauling permit, and the preparation and carrying 13of a manifest shall not be required for such sludge under the 14rules of the Pollution Control Board. The unit of local 15government which operates the treatment plant producing such 16sludge shall file an annual report with the Agency identifying 17the volume of such sludge transported during the reporting 18period, the hauler of the sludge, and the disposal sites to 19which it was transported. This subsection (j) shall not apply 20to hazardous waste.21    (k) Fail or refuse to pay any fee imposed under this Act.22    (l) Locate a hazardous waste disposal site above an active 23or inactive shaft or tunneled mine or within 2 miles of an 24active fault in the earth's crust. In counties of population 25less than 225,000 no hazardous waste disposal site shall be 26located (1) within 1 1/2 miles of the corporate limits as   HB5541 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1defined on June 30, 1978, of any municipality without the 2approval of the governing body of the municipality in an 3official action; or (2) within 1000 feet of an existing 4private well or the existing source of a public water supply 5measured from the boundary of the actual active permitted site 6and excluding existing private wells on the property of the 7permit applicant. The provisions of this subsection do not 8apply to publicly owned sewage works or the disposal or 9utilization of sludge from publicly owned sewage works.10    (m) Transfer interest in any land which has been used as a 11hazardous waste disposal site without written notification to 12the Agency of the transfer and to the transferee of the 13conditions imposed by the Agency upon its use under subsection 14(g) of Section 39.15    (n) Use any land which has been used as a hazardous waste 16disposal site except in compliance with conditions imposed by 17the Agency under subsection (g) of Section 39.18    (o) Conduct a sanitary landfill operation which is 19required to have a permit under subsection (d) of this 20Section, in a manner which results in any of the following 21conditions:22        (1) refuse in standing or flowing waters;23        (2) leachate flows entering waters of the State;24        (3) leachate flows exiting the landfill confines (as 25    determined by the boundaries established for the landfill 26    by a permit issued by the Agency);  HB5541 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1        (4) open burning of refuse in violation of Section 9 2    of this Act;3        (5) uncovered refuse remaining from any previous 4    operating day or at the conclusion of any operating day, 5    unless authorized by permit;6        (6) failure to provide final cover within time limits 7    established by Board regulations;8        (7) acceptance of wastes without necessary permits;9        (8) scavenging as defined by Board regulations;10        (9) deposition of refuse in any unpermitted portion of 11    the landfill;12        (10) acceptance of a special waste without a required 13    manifest;14        (11) failure to submit reports required by permits or 15    Board regulations;16        (12) failure to collect and contain litter from the 17    site by the end of each operating day;18        (13) failure to submit any cost estimate for the site 19    or any performance bond or other security for the site as 20    required by this Act or Board rules.21    The prohibitions specified in this subsection (o) shall be 22enforceable by the Agency either by administrative citation 23under Section 31.1 of this Act or as otherwise provided by this 24Act. The specific prohibitions in this subsection do not limit 25the power of the Board to establish regulations or standards 26applicable to sanitary landfills.  HB5541 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1    (p) In violation of subdivision (a) of this Section, cause 2or allow the open dumping of any waste in a manner which 3results in any of the following occurrences at the dump site:4        (1) litter;5        (2) scavenging;6        (3) open burning;7        (4) deposition of waste in standing or flowing waters;8        (5) proliferation of disease vectors;9        (6) standing or flowing liquid discharge from the dump 10    site;11        (7) deposition of:12            (i) general construction or demolition debris as 13        defined in Section 3.160(a) of this Act; or14            (ii) clean construction or demolition debris as 15        defined in Section 3.160(b) of this Act.16    The prohibitions specified in this subsection (p) shall be 17enforceable by the Agency either by administrative citation 18under Section 31.1 of this Act or as otherwise provided by this 19Act. The specific prohibitions in this subsection do not limit 20the power of the Board to establish regulations or standards 21applicable to open dumping.22    (q) Conduct a landscape waste composting operation without 23an Agency permit, provided, however, that no permit shall be 24required for any person:25        (1) conducting a landscape waste composting operation 26    for landscape wastes generated by such person's own   HB5541 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1    activities which are stored, treated, or disposed of 2    within the site where such wastes are generated; or3        (1.5) conducting a landscape waste composting 4    operation that (i) has no more than 25 cubic yards of 5    landscape waste, composting additives, composting 6    material, or end-product compost on-site at any one time 7    and (ii) is not engaging in commercial activity; or 8        (2) applying landscape waste or composted landscape 9    waste at agronomic rates; or10        (2.5) operating a landscape waste composting facility 11    at a site having 10 or more occupied non-farm residences 12    within 1/2 mile of its boundaries, if the facility meets 13    all of the following criteria: 14            (A) the composting facility is operated by the 15        farmer on property on which the composting material is 16        utilized, and the composting facility constitutes no 17        more than 2% of the site's total acreage;18            (A-5) any composting additives that the composting 19        facility accepts and uses at the facility are 20        necessary to provide proper conditions for composting 21        and do not exceed 10% of the total composting material 22        at the facility at any one time; 23            (B) the property on which the composting facility 24        is located, and any associated property on which the 25        compost is used, is principally and diligently devoted 26        to the production of agricultural crops and is not   HB5541 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1        owned, leased, or otherwise controlled by any waste 2        hauler or generator of nonagricultural compost 3        materials, and the operator of the composting facility 4        is not an employee, partner, shareholder, or in any 5        way connected with or controlled by any such waste 6        hauler or generator; 7            (C) all compost generated by the composting 8        facility, except incidental sales of finished compost, 9        is applied at agronomic rates and used as mulch, 10        fertilizer, or soil conditioner on land actually 11        farmed by the person operating the composting 12        facility, and the finished compost is not stored at 13        the composting site for a period longer than 18 months 14        prior to its application as mulch, fertilizer, or soil 15        conditioner; 16            (D) no fee is charged for the acceptance of 17        materials to be composted at the facility; and 18            (E) the owner or operator, by January 1, 2014 (or 19        the January 1 following commencement of operation, 20        whichever is later) and January 1 of each year 21        thereafter, registers the site with the Agency, (ii) 22        reports to the Agency on the volume of composting 23        material received and used at the site; (iii) 24        certifies to the Agency that the site complies with 25        the requirements set forth in subparagraphs (A), 26        (A-5), (B), (C), and (D) of this paragraph (2.5); and   HB5541 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1        (iv) certifies to the Agency that all composting 2        material was placed more than 200 feet from the 3        nearest potable water supply well, was placed outside 4        the boundary of the 10-year floodplain or on a part of 5        the site that is floodproofed, was placed at least 6        one-fourth of a 1/4 mile from the nearest residence 7        (other than a residence located on the same property 8        as the facility) or a lesser distance from the nearest 9        residence (other than a residence located on the same 10        property as the facility) if the municipality in which 11        the facility is located has by ordinance approved a 12        lesser distance than one-fourth of a 1/4 mile, and was 13        placed more than 5 feet above the water table; any 14        ordinance approving a residential setback of less than 15        one-fourth of a 1/4 mile that is used to meet the 16        requirements of this subparagraph (E) of paragraph 17        (2.5) of this subsection must specifically reference 18        this paragraph; or 19        (3) operating a landscape waste composting facility on 20    a farm, if the facility meets all of the following 21    criteria:22            (A) the composting facility is operated by the 23        farmer on property on which the composting material is 24        utilized, and the composting facility constitutes no 25        more than 2% of the property's total acreage, except 26        that the Board may allow a higher percentage for   HB5541 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1        individual sites where the owner or operator has 2        demonstrated to the Board that the site's soil 3        characteristics or crop needs require a higher rate;4            (A-1) the composting facility accepts from other 5        agricultural operations for composting with landscape 6        waste no materials other than uncontaminated and 7        source-separated (i) crop residue and other 8        agricultural plant residue generated from the 9        production and harvesting of crops and other customary 10        farm practices, including, but not limited to, stalks, 11        leaves, seed pods, husks, bagasse, and roots and (ii) 12        plant-derived animal bedding, such as straw or 13        sawdust, that is free of manure and was not made from 14        painted or treated wood; 15            (A-2) any composting additives that the composting 16        facility accepts and uses at the facility are 17        necessary to provide proper conditions for composting 18        and do not exceed 10% of the total composting material 19        at the facility at any one time; 20            (B) the property on which the composting facility 21        is located, and any associated property on which the 22        compost is used, is principally and diligently devoted 23        to the production of agricultural crops and is not 24        owned, leased or otherwise controlled by any waste 25        hauler or generator of nonagricultural compost 26        materials, and the operator of the composting facility   HB5541 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1        is not an employee, partner, shareholder, or in any 2        way connected with or controlled by any such waste 3        hauler or generator;4            (C) all compost generated by the composting 5        facility, except incidental sales of finished compost, 6        is applied at agronomic rates and used as mulch, 7        fertilizer or soil conditioner on land actually farmed 8        by the person operating the composting facility, and 9        the finished compost is not stored at the composting 10        site for a period longer than 18 months prior to its 11        application as mulch, fertilizer, or soil conditioner;12            (D) the owner or operator, by January 1 of each 13        year, (i) registers the site with the Agency, (ii) 14        reports to the Agency on the volume of composting 15        material received and used at the site and the volume 16        of material comprising the incidental sale of finished 17        compost under this subsection (q), (iii) certifies to 18        the Agency that the site complies with the 19        requirements set forth in subparagraphs (A), (A-1), 20        (A-2), (B), and (C) of this paragraph (q)(3), and (iv) 21        certifies to the Agency that all composting material: 22                (I) was placed more than 200 feet from the 23            nearest potable water supply well;24                (II) was placed outside the boundary of the 25            10-year floodplain or on a part of the site that is 26            floodproofed;  HB5541 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1                (III) was placed either (aa) at least 2            one-fourth of a 1/4 mile from the nearest 3            residence (other than a residence located on the 4            same property as the facility) and there are not 5            more than 10 occupied non-farm residences within 6            1/2 mile of the boundaries of the site on the date 7            of application or (bb) a lesser distance from the 8            nearest residence (other than a residence located 9            on the same property as the facility) provided 10            that the municipality or county in which the 11            facility is located has by ordinance approved a 12            lesser distance than one-fourth of a 1/4 mile and 13            there are not more than 10 occupied non-farm 14            residences within 1/2 mile of the boundaries of 15            the site on the date of application; and16                (IV) was placed more than 5 feet above the 17            water table. 18            Any ordinance approving a residential setback of 19        less than one-fourth of a 1/4 mile that is used to meet 20        the requirements of this subparagraph (D) must 21        specifically reference this subparagraph.22    For the purposes of this subsection (q), "agronomic rates" 23means the application of not more than 20 tons per acre per 24year, except that the Board may allow a higher rate for 25individual sites where the owner or operator has demonstrated 26to the Board that the site's soil characteristics or crop   HB5541 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1needs require a higher rate.2    For the purposes of this subsection (q), "incidental sale 3of finished compost" means the sale of finished compost that 4meets general use compost standards and is no more than 20% or 5300 cubic yards, whichever is less, of the total compost 6created annually by a private landowner for the landowner's 7own use. 8    (r) Cause or allow the storage or disposal of coal 9combustion waste unless:10        (1) such waste is stored or disposed of at a site or 11    facility for which a permit has been obtained or is not 12    otherwise required under subsection (d) of this Section; 13    or14        (2) such waste is stored or disposed of as a part of 15    the design and reclamation of a site or facility which is 16    an abandoned mine site in accordance with the Abandoned 17    Mined Lands and Water Reclamation Act; or18        (3) such waste is stored or disposed of at a site or 19    facility which is operating under NPDES and Subtitle D 20    permits issued by the Agency pursuant to regulations 21    adopted by the Board for mine-related water pollution and 22    permits issued pursuant to the federal Surface Mining 23    Control and Reclamation Act of 1977 (P.L. 95-87) or the 24    rules and regulations thereunder or any law or rule or 25    regulation adopted by the State of Illinois pursuant 26    thereto, and the owner or operator of the facility agrees   HB5541 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1    to accept the waste; and either:2            (i) such waste is stored or disposed of in 3        accordance with requirements applicable to refuse 4        disposal under regulations adopted by the Board for 5        mine-related water pollution and pursuant to NPDES and 6        Subtitle D permits issued by the Agency under such 7        regulations; or8            (ii) the owner or operator of the facility 9        demonstrates all of the following to the Agency, and 10        the facility is operated in accordance with the 11        demonstration as approved by the Agency: (1) the 12        disposal area will be covered in a manner that will 13        support continuous vegetation, (2) the facility will 14        be adequately protected from wind and water erosion, 15        (3) the pH will be maintained so as to prevent 16        excessive leaching of metal ions, and (4) adequate 17        containment or other measures will be provided to 18        protect surface water and groundwater from 19        contamination at levels prohibited by this Act, the 20        Illinois Groundwater Protection Act, or regulations 21        adopted pursuant thereto.22    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Title, the 23disposal of coal combustion waste pursuant to item (2) or (3) 24of this subdivision (r) shall be exempt from the other 25provisions of this Title V, and notwithstanding the provisions 26of Title X of this Act, the Agency is authorized to grant   HB5541 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1experimental permits which include provision for the disposal 2of wastes from the combustion of coal and other materials 3pursuant to items (2) and (3) of this subdivision (r).4    (s) After April 1, 1989, offer for transportation, 5transport, deliver, receive or accept special waste for which 6a manifest is required, unless the manifest indicates that the 7fee required under Section 22.8 of this Act has been paid.8    (t) Cause or allow a lateral expansion of a municipal 9solid waste landfill unit on or after October 9, 1993, without 10a permit modification, granted by the Agency, that authorizes 11the lateral expansion.12    (u) Conduct any vegetable by-product treatment, storage, 13disposal or transportation operation in violation of any 14regulation, standards or permit requirements adopted by the 15Board under this Act. However, no permit shall be required 16under this Title V for the land application of vegetable 17by-products conducted pursuant to Agency permit issued under 18Title III of this Act to the generator of the vegetable 19by-products. In addition, vegetable by-products may be 20transported in this State without a special waste hauling 21permit, and without the preparation and carrying of a 22manifest.23    (v) (Blank).24    (w) Conduct any generation, transportation, or recycling 25of construction or demolition debris, clean or general, or 26uncontaminated soil generated during construction, remodeling,   HB5541 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1repair, and demolition of utilities, structures, and roads 2that is not commingled with any waste, without the maintenance 3of documentation identifying the hauler, generator, place of 4origin of the debris or soil, the weight or volume of the 5debris or soil, and the location, owner, and operator of the 6facility where the debris or soil was transferred, disposed, 7recycled, or treated. This documentation must be maintained by 8the generator, transporter, or recycler for 3 years. This 9subsection (w) shall not apply to (1) a permitted pollution 10control facility that transfers or accepts construction or 11demolition debris, clean or general, or uncontaminated soil 12for final disposal, recycling, or treatment, (2) a public 13utility (as that term is defined in the Public Utilities Act) 14or a municipal utility, (3) the Illinois Department of 15Transportation, or (4) a municipality or a county highway 16department, with the exception of any municipality or county 17highway department located within a county having a population 18of over 3,000,000 inhabitants or located in a county that is 19contiguous to a county having a population of over 3,000,000 20inhabitants; but it shall apply to an entity that contracts 21with a public utility, a municipal utility, the Illinois 22Department of Transportation, or a municipality or a county 23highway department. The terms "generation" and "recycling", as 24used in this subsection, do not apply to clean construction or 25demolition debris when (i) used as fill material below grade 26outside of a setback zone if covered by sufficient   HB5541 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1uncontaminated soil to support vegetation within 30 days of 2the completion of filling or if covered by a road or structure, 3(ii) solely broken concrete without protruding metal bars is 4used for erosion control, or (iii) milled asphalt or crushed 5concrete is used as aggregate in construction of the shoulder 6of a roadway. The terms "generation" and "recycling", as used 7in this subsection, do not apply to uncontaminated soil that 8is not commingled with any waste when (i) used as fill material 9below grade or contoured to grade, or (ii) used at the site of 10generation.11    (y) Inject any carbon dioxide stream produced by a carbon 12dioxide capture project into a Class II well, as defined by the 13Board under this Act, or a Class VI well converted from a Class 14II well, for purposes of enhanced oil or gas recovery, 15including, but not limited to, the facilitation of enhanced 16oil or gas recovery from another well.17    (z) Sell or transport concentrated carbon dioxide stream 18produced by a carbon dioxide capture project for use in 19enhanced oil or gas recovery.20    (aa) Operate a carbon sequestration activity in a manner 21that causes, threatens, or allows the release of carbon 22dioxide so as to tend to cause water pollution in this State. 23    (bb) Conduct an organic waste composting operation without 24an Agency permit, provided, however, that no permit shall be 25required for any person:26        (1) conducting an organic waste composting operation   HB5541 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1    for organic wastes generated by such person's own 2    activities which are stored, treated, or disposed of 3    within the site where such wastes are generated; or4        (2) conducting an organic waste composting operation 5    that (i) has not more than 50 cubic yards of organic waste, 6    composting additives, composting material, or end-product 7    compost on-site at any one time and (ii) is not engaging in 8    commercial activity.9    Landscape waste composting operations, including landscape 10waste composting operations that accept organic waste as an 11additive, are subject to subsection (q) rather than this 12subsection (bb).13(Source: P.A. 102-216, eff. 1-1-22; 102-310, eff. 8-6-21; 14102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-342, eff. 151-1-24; 103-651, eff. 7-18-24.) 16    (415 ILCS 5/22.34)17    Sec. 22.34. Organic waste compost quality standards. 18    (a) The Agency may develop and make recommendations to the 19Board concerning (i) performance standards for organic waste 20compost facilities and (ii) testing procedures and standards 21for the end-product compost produced by organic waste compost 22facilities.23    The Agency, in cooperation with the Department, shall 24appoint a Technical Advisory Committee for the purpose of 25developing these recommendations. Among other things, the   HB5541 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1Committee shall evaluate environmental and safety 2considerations, compliance costs, and regulations adopted in 3other states and countries. The Committee shall have balanced 4representation and shall include members representing 5academia, the composting industry, the Department of 6Agriculture, the landscaping industry, environmental 7organizations, municipalities, and counties.8    Performance standards for organic waste compost facilities 9may include, but are not limited to: 10        (1) the management of potential exposures for human 11    disease vectors and odor; 12        (2) the management of surface water; 13        (3) contingency planning for handling end-product 14    compost material that does not meet end-product compost 15    standards adopted by the Board; 16        (4) plans for intended purposes of end-use product; 17    and 18        (5) a financial assurance plan necessary to restore 19    the site as specified in Agency permit. The financial 20    assurance plan may include, but is not limited to, posting 21    with the Agency a performance bond or other security for 22    the purpose of ensuring site restoration. 23    (b) No later than one year after the Agency makes 24recommendations to the Board under subsection (a) of this 25Section, the Board shall adopt, as applicable: 26        (1) performance standards for organic waste compost   HB5541 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1    facilities; and 2        (2) testing procedures and standards for the 3    end-product compost produced by organic waste compost 4    facilities.5    The Board shall evaluate the merits of different standards 6for end-product compost applications.7    (c) On-site residential composting that is used solely for 8the purpose of composting organic waste generated on-site and 9that will not be offered for off-site sale or use is exempt 10from any standards promulgated under subsections (a) and (b). 11Subsection (b)(2) shall not apply to end-product compost used 12as daily cover or vegetative amendment in the final layer. 13Subsection (b) applies to any end-product compost offered for 14sale or use in Illinois.15    (d) (Blank). For the purposes of this Section, "organic 16waste" means food scrap, landscape waste, wood waste, 17livestock waste, crop residue, paper waste, or other 18non-hazardous carbonaceous waste that is collected and 19processed separately from the rest of the municipal waste 20stream.21    (e) Except as otherwise provided in Board rules, solid 22waste permits for organic waste composting facilities shall be 23issued under the Board's Solid Waste rules at 35 Ill. Adm. Code 24807. The permits must include, but shall not be limited to, 25measures designed to reduce pathogens in the compost. 26    (f) Standards adopted under this Section do not apply to   HB5541 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 19752 BDA 34191 b1compost operations exempt from permitting under paragraph 2(1.5) of subsection (q) or under paragraph (2) of subsection 3(bb) of Section 21 of this Act. 4(Source: P.A. 98-239, eff. 8-9-13.) 5    (415 ILCS 5/3.197 rep.)6    Section 10. The Environmental Protection Act is amended by 7repealing Section 3.197.